src/twol-rus.txt
! Russian TWOLC file
!
! $Id$
!
!

Alphabet
  а А б Б в В г Г д Д е Е ж Ж 
  з З и И й Й к К л Л м М н Н 
  о О п П р Р с С т Т у У ф Ф 
  х Х ц Ц ч Ч ш Ш щ Щ ъ Ъ ы Ы 
  ь Ь э Э ю Ю я Я ё Ё 
!  а2:а о2:о е2:е и2:и у2:у я2:я ё2:ё ы2:ы ю2:ю э2:э
!  А2:А О2:О Е2:Е И2:И У2:У Я2:Я Ё2:Ё Ы2:Ы Ю2:Ю Э2:Э
  %^LV:0
  %>:0 ;


!  а2 о2 е2 и2 у2 я2 ё2 ы2 ю2 э2
!  А2 О2 Е2 И2 У2 Я2 Ё2 Ы2 Ю2 Э2

Sets
 C	= б Б в В г Г д Д ж Ж з З й Й к К л Л м М н Н п П р Р 
          с С т Т ф Ф х Х ц Ц ч Ч ш Ш щ Щ ъ Ъ ь Ь э Э ;
 V	= а А е Е и И о О у У ы Ы ю Ю я Я ё Ё ;
 PALVOW = е Е и И ю Ю я Я ё Ё ;
 NPLVOW = а А о О у У ы Ы э Э ;
 Dummy  = %^LV ;

!Definitions
!;

Rules



"Palatal Suffix Vowel"
 Vx:Vy <=> ь: %>:0 _ ;
       where Vx in ( а А э Э ы Ы о О у У )
       	     Vy in ( я Я е Е и И е Е ю Ю )
	     matched ;

!€ житель%>ов
!€ житель0ев

"Palatal Mark Deletion"
 ь:0 <=> C: _ %>:0 [ :я | :Я | :е | :Е | :и | :И | :ё | :Ё | :ю | :Ю ] ;


"Neuter o Deletion"
Vx:0 <=> V (C+) _ (Dummy:) %>:0 ;
	where Vx in ( а А о О я Я е Е ё Ё ) ;

!€ правило%>а
!€ правил00а

"Light vowel o"
 Vx:0 <=> _ C %^LV:0 %>:0 V ;
       where Vx in ( о О ) ;
       
!€ со2н%>a
!€ с0н0а

"Light vowel e in after non-l"
 Vx:0 <=>  [ C - [л|Л]] _ C (ь:) %^LV:0 %>:0 V ;
 		where Vx in ( е Е ё Ё ) ;

"Light vowel e in after l"
 Vx:ъ <=>  [л|Л] _ C %^LV:0 %>:0 V ;
 		where Vx in ( е Е ё Ё ) ;

"Light vowel e in after Vow"
 Vx:Vy <=>  V _ C %^LV:0 %>:0 V ;
 		where Vx in ( е Е ё Ё ) ;
 		where Vx in ( й  Й  й  Й ) ;
 		matched ;

"Nominal 3rd declension kgx rule"

 ы:и <=> [  к | К | г | Г | х | Х ] %> _ ;

!"Light vowel o"
! Vx:0 <=> _ C %>:0 V ;
!       where Vx in ( о2 О2 ) ;
!       
!!€ со2н%>a
!!€ с0н0а
!
!"Light vowel e in after non-l"
! Vx:0 <=>  [ C - [л|Л]] _ C %>:0 V ;
! 		where Vx in ( е2 Е2 ё2 ё2 ) ;
!
!"Light vowel e in after l"
! Vx:ъ <=>  [л|Л] _ C %>:0 V ;
! 		where Vx in ( е2 Е2 ё2 ё2 ) ;
!
!"Light vowel e in after Vow"
! Vx:Vy <=>  V _ C %>:0 V ;
! 		where Vx in ( е2 Е2 ё2 Ё2 ) ;
! 		where Vx in ( й  Й  й  Й ) ;
! 		matched ;
